District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1103.05

District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics created; penalties; advisory opinions.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 458, Pub. L. 93-376, title III, § 306
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2178, Pub. L. 93-635, § 14(a)
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title III, § 302(a), 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(f), (r), 29 DCR 458
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-163, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5812
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1435.
1973 Ed., § 1-1156.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of District of Columbia Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Act of 1974 Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-22, June 17, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 3236).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).